Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-711
Court; examine evidence; issue discovery orders.

In a proceeding under sections 30-701 to 30-713, the court may examine any medical evidence in camera or issue any protective discovery orders needed to comply with the provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, any regulations promulgated under such federal act, or any other provision of law.

Laws 2018, LB845, § 11.